Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska37-1011
Lease of undeveloped land; when.

If any portions of the right-of-way accepted under section 37-912 or 37-914 are not immediately developed as a state recreational trail or for habitat, the Game and Parks Commission shall use its best efforts to lease undeveloped portions of the right-of-way, with first priority to adjacent landowners, for the purposes stated in section 37-912 or 37-914 or for other purposes which are not inconsistent with the purposes of section 37-912 or 37-914 until such time as a state recreational trail or habitat may be developed. Any lease or use allowed shall be subject to all prescriptions of the National Trails System Act.

Laws 1993, LB 739, § 3;

Laws 1996, LB 584, § 20;

R.S.1943, (1996), § 81-815.60;

Laws 1998, LB 922, § 386;

Laws 2000, LB 701, § 2.